Washington statutes.
RCW 36.83.050

Local improvement districts authorized—Assessments—Special assessment bonds and revenue bonds—Limitations.

(1) A service district may form a local improvement district or utility local improvement district to provide any local improvement it has the authority to provide, impose special assessments on all property specially benefited by the local improvements, and issue special assessment bonds or revenue bonds to fund the costs of the local improvement. Improvement districts shall be created and assessments shall be made and collected pursuant to chapters 35.43, 35.44, 35.49, 35.50, 35.53, and 35.54 RCW.

(2) The governing body of a service district shall by resolution establish for each special assessment bond issue the amount, date, terms, conditions, denominations, maximum fixed or variable interest rate or rates, maturity or maturities, redemption rights, registration privileges, if any, covenants, and form, including registration as to principal and interest, registration as to principal only, or bearer. Registration may include, but not be limited to: (a) A book entry system of recording the ownership of a bond whether or not physical bonds are issued; or (b) recording the ownership of a bond together with the requirement that the transfer of ownership may only be effected by the surrender of the old bond and either the reissuance of the old bond or the issuance of a new bond to the new owner. Facsimile signatures may be used on the bonds and any coupons. The maximum term of any special assessment bonds shall not exceed thirty years beyond the date of issue. Special assessment bonds issued pursuant to this section shall not be an indebtedness of the service district issuing the bonds, and the interest and principal on the bonds shall only be payable from special assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were issued and any local improvement guaranty fund that the service district has created. The owner or bearer of a special assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section shall not have any claim against the service district arising from the bond or coupon except for the payment from special assessments made for the improvement for which the bonds were issued and any local improvement guaranty fund the service district has created. The service district issuing the special assessment bonds is not liable to the owner or bearer of any special assessment bond or any interest coupon issued pursuant to this section for any loss occurring in the lawful operation of its local improvement guaranty fund. The substance of the limitations included in this subsection shall be plainly printed, written, or engraved on each special assessment bond issued pursuant to this section.

(3) The governing body may establish and pay moneys into a local improvement guaranty fund to guarantee special assessment bonds issued by the service district.

(4) The governing body of a service district shall provide for the payment of both the special assessments which are imposed and a portion of the utility income from the utility improvement into a special fund established for the payment of the revenue bonds to defray the cost of the utility local improvement district whenever it desires to create a utility local improvement district and issue revenue bonds to fund the local improvement.

[ 1983 c 130 s 5.]